North Carolina, session 2025, HB245.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 143-433.9 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143-433.9. Allocation.
(a) To provide for the orderly and prompt issuance of bonds the allocation of which is
managed under this Article, the Committee must follow formulas for allocating the following:
(i) the unified volume limitation, (ii) the state housing credit ceiling, (iii) the annual aggregate
limitation on the face amount of qualified public educational facility bonds, (iv) the limitation on
issuance of recovery zone facility bonds, (v) the limitation on issuance of recovery zone
economic development bonds, and (vi) the limitation on issuance of qualified energy
conservation bonds. The unified volume limitation for all issues of private activity bonds, other
than qualified public educational facility bonds and recovery zone facility bonds, in North
Carolina shall be considered as a single resource to be allocated under this Article. The annual
aggregate limitation on the face amount of qualified public educational facility bonds for all
issues in North Carolina shall be considered as a single resource to be allocated under this Article.
The Committee shall issue the following: (i) allocations of the unified volume limitation, (ii)
allocations of the state housing credit ceiling, (iii) allocations and reallocations of the aggregate
limitation on the face amount of qualified public educational facility bonds, (iv) allocation and
reallocation of the authority for issuance of recovery zone facility bonds allocated to the State,
(v) allocation and reallocation of the authority for issuance of recovery zone economic
development bonds allocated to the State, (vi) allocation and reallocation of authority for issuance
of qualified energy conservation bonds allocated to the State, and (vii) allocation of other
limitations on authority to issue bonds as may be directed by the Governor. The Committee shall
set forth procedures for making such allocations and in the making of such allocations shall take
into consideration the best interest of the State of North Carolina with regard to the economic
development, school facility needs, energy conservation, green initiatives, and general prosperity
of the people of North Carolina. In making the initial allocations for recovery zone facility bonds
and recovery zone economic development bonds, the Committee shall follow the formula
provided in section 1400U-1(a)(3) of ARRTA. In making the initial allocation for qualified
energy conservation bonds, the Committee shall follow the guidelines provided in section 54D
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. The Committee shall make all elective carryforwards of
the unused unified volume limitation, the annual aggregate limitation on the face amount of
*H245-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
qualified public educational facility bonds, recovery zone facility bonds, qualified energy
conservation bonds, and any other bonds or tax credits over which it has allocation authority on
behalf of the State. The Committee shall monitor the issuance of qualified energy conservation
bonds to ensure that not more than thirty percent (30%) of such bonds are used for purposes that
would be treated as private activity bonds under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
The Committee is authorized to establish a procedure to monitor whether the initial allocations
of recovery zone facility bonds or recovery zone economic development bonds to counties and
large municipalities pursuant to ARRTA will be utilized, for an allocation that will not be utilized
to be waived by notice to the Committee, and for the reallocation of the waived allocation to
other projects that qualify pursuant to ARRTA.
(b) In administering the low-income housing credit program, the Committee shall adopt
a Qualified Allocation Plan (the Plan) as required by 26 U.S.C. § 42(m) annually. Solely with
respect to the adoption of the Plan, the Committee is exempt from the requirements of Article 2A
of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The Committee, and any agency designated by the
Committee to administer the Plan, shall only adopt and administer the Plan if it incentivizes the
development and availability of affordable housing in rural communities and counties with
higher poverty levels. Prior to adoption or amendment of the Plan, the Committee shall:
(1) Publish the proposed Plan in the North Carolina Register at least 30 days prior
to the adoption of the final Plan;
(2) Notify any person who has applied for the low-income housing credit in the
previous year and any other interested parties of its intent to adopt the Plan;
(3) Accept oral and written comments on the proposed Plan; and
(4) Hold at least one public hearing on the proposed Plan.
(b1) When administering the low-income housing credit program and adopting a Qualified
Allocation Plan (the Plan) as required by 26 U.S.C. § 42(m) annually, the Committee, and any
agency designated by the Committee to the extent necessary to administer the Plan, shall, in the
interest of incentivizing the development of affordable housing in rural and impoverished
communities, use at least all of the following guidelines and criteria when determining how to
allocate tax credits under the Plan:
(1) The distance between a proposed site and surrounding amenities, including
grocery stores, shopping centers, and pharmacies, shall be calculated using a
radius and not by using actual road driving distance.
(2) When a proposed site is located in a municipality with a population of less
than 10,000 people, favorable consideration shall be awarded to proposed sites
that are located 10 miles and less from the amenities identified in the Plan.
(3) When identifying amenities, the Plan shall define grocery amenities as stores
that have grocery sections.
(4) When two proposed sites are "tied" under the scoring criteria of the Plan, the
proposed site located in the area with the highest poverty level shall be
awarded the tax credits under the Plan.
(c) In administering the allocation and reallocation of authority for issuance of qualified
energy conservation bonds allocated to the State and reallocated to any "large local government"
as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 54D(e), the Committee shall establish procedures (i) to monitor whether
the initial sub-allocations of qualified energy conservation bonds to large local governments will
be utilized by October 1, 2017; (ii) for the waiver and return to the Committee of sub-allocations
that will not meet the deadline imposed by this subsection; and (iii) for the reallocation of
returned sub-allocations for other projects or purposes that qualify under 26 U.S.C. § 54D(f) for
financing with qualified energy conservation bonds. The Committee shall also develop programs
described by 26 U.S.C. § 54D(f)(1)(A)(iii) and shall consider those programs along with other
eligible uses for qualified energy conservation bonds in determining the reallocation of unused
and returned qualified energy conservation bond allocation."
Page 2 House Bill 245-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to Qualified
Allocation Plans adopted by the North Carolina Federal Tax Reform Allocation Committee, or
any agency designated by that Committee, after that date.
House Bill 245-First Edition Page 3